Wyoming, session 2025, HB0162.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-24-201 through 9-24-207 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 2
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
INTERACTIVE GAMING

9-24-201. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Commission" means the Wyoming gaming
commission;

(ii) "Interactive game" means an internet based
version or variation of poker, blackjack or any other card,
slot or gambling game typically offered in a casino and
approved by the commission, in which:

(A) A person wagers money or something of
monetary value for the opportunity to win money or a thing
of monetary value;

(B) The outcome of the game may be
determined by a random number generator, or a skill element
may be essential to the game's outcome, depending on the
type of game utilized; and

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(C) The game is accessed by the player
using a computer, digital platform or mobile application on
a mobile device that is connected to the internet.

(iii) "Interactive gaming" means engaging in
interactive games conducted by an interactive gaming
operator over the internet by use of a computer, digital
platform or mobile application on a mobile device, that
uses communications technology to accept wagers.
Interactive gaming shall not include any of the following
gaming activities:

(A) Activities, other than interactive
gaming, that are exempted from criminal penalties under
W.S. 6-7-101 through 6-7-104;

(B) Activities outside of this article
authorized or regulated by the commission;

(C) Lotteries authorized by law;

(D) Fantasy sports contests;

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(E) Interactive games offered exclusively
on Indian lands by an Indian tribe operating in accordance
with a Tribal-State gaming compact and authorized to
conduct class III gaming pursuant to federal law. For
purposes of this article, an interactive game is conducted
exclusively on Indian lands only if the person
participating in interactive gaming is physically present
on Indian lands when the interactive game is initiated and
the game is offered by an Indian tribe operating on the
same Indian lands as an intratribal transaction under 31
U.S.C. § 5362(10)(c).

(iv) "Interactive gaming operator" means any
qualified gaming entity permitted by the commission to
accept interactive gaming wagers;

(v) "Interactive gaming revenue" means the total
amount of all wagers placed by persons with an interactive
gaming operator using cash or cash equivalents, excluding
free wagers and promotional play, minus all payments to
patrons and minus any applicable federal excise taxes.
Payments to patrons include all payments of cash, cash
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
equivalents, merchandise and any other thing of monetary
value;

(vi) "Interactive gaming vendor" means a vendor
that provides services to an interactive gaming operator
which directly affect wagering, play or results of
interactive gaming including geolocation services, know
your customer services, payment processors and game
providers;

(vii) "Live game simulcast" means an interactive
live feed of an interactive game that is conducted at a
live interactive game studio and in which participants have
the ability to wager in real time;

(viii) "Live interactive game studio" means a
physical location that utilizes live video and audio
streaming technology to provide an interactive gaming
operator with a live game simulcast;

(ix) "Patron" means a person who places an
interactive gaming wager;

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(x) "Permissible jurisdiction" means a
jurisdiction other than Wyoming where wagers on interactive
gaming may be accepted pursuant to an interactive gaming
reciprocal agreement;

(xi) "Qualified gaming entity" means a gaming
entity that offers interactive gaming through computers,
digital platforms or mobile applications on a mobile device
in not less than three (3) states in the United States
pursuant to a state regulatory structure.

9-24-202. Interactive gaming regulation; rulemaking.

(a) The commission shall regulate interactive gaming
and interactive gaming operators and vendors.

(b) The commission shall promulgate rules to
implement this article. The rules the commission
promulgates shall establish standards and procedures for
interactive gaming and associated interactive gaming
platforms. The rules shall include:

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(i) Governance of the conduct of interactive
gaming and the system of wagering associated with
interactive gaming, including all of the following:

(A) Terms and conditions for interactive
gaming that are compliant with all applicable federal laws;

(B) Identification of the types of
interactive games upon which wagers may be accepted;

(C) The manner in which interactive gaming
wagers are received and payoffs are remitted;

(D) Procedures for managing and resolving
suspected cheating, irregularities and complaints;

(E) A requirement that a patron shall be
physically present in Wyoming when making a wager unless
the patron is physically present in a permissible
jurisdiction;

(F) A requirement for each interactive
gaming operator to use a geolocation system to ensure that
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
a patron making an interactive gaming wager is physically
present in the state when making the wager unless the
patron is physically present in a permissible jurisdiction;

(G) Internal controls for all aspects of
interactive gaming, including procedures for system
integrity, system security, operations and accounting;

(H) Operational controls for interactive
gaming accounts;

(J) Procedures to ensure that interactive
gaming operators do not offer prohibited interactive games;

(K) Requirements for the offering of live
game simulcasting, which shall be permitted to be conducted
from live interactive game studio premises in any location
and shall not be located in Wyoming.

(ii) Methods for calculating interactive gaming
revenue and standards for the counting and recording of
money and things of monetary value received in the conduct
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
of interactive gaming, including requirements for internal
controls, financial records and audits;

(iii) Reasonable minimum qualifications for
interactive gaming operators and vendors;

(iv) Any other matters necessary for overseeing
interactive gaming and interactive gaming operators and
vendors.

(c) In promulgating rules pursuant to this section,
the commission shall examine the regulations implemented in
Wyoming for online sports wagering and regulations
promulgated in other states where interactive gaming is
conducted and shall, as far as practicable, adopt a similar
regulatory framework to maximize revenue generated to the
state.

(d) Interactive gaming shall not be conducted from
any physical location designed for a patron to physically
visit to place a wager. Interactive gaming shall be deemed
to take place at the location of the patron participating
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
in an interactive game and not the location of the server
of an interactive gaming permittee or any other location.

(e) The commission shall develop a compliance program
that includes establishing procedures to review interactive
gaming and related activities occurring in the state to
ensure compliance with and enforcement of this article. The
program shall include review and evaluation of the conduct
of:

(i) Interactive gaming operators, interactive
gaming vendors, qualified gaming entities, patrons and any
other person permitted or authorized to engage in
activities under this article; and

(ii) Persons operating without a valid permit
under this article, engaging in activities not authorized
or regulated under this article or pursuing or engaging in
activities otherwise in violation of this article.

9-24-203. Permits; fees; application.

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(a) An interactive gaming operator shall possess a
permit issued by the commission to accept interactive
gaming wagers. No operator shall accept interactive gaming
wagers without holding a valid permit issued by the
commission.

(b) A qualified gaming entity applying for an
interactive gaming operator permit shall do so on an
application furnished by the commission. The commission
shall offer an abbreviated application for a qualified
gaming entity that holds an online sports wagering operator
permit in Wyoming pursuant to W.S. 9-24-103, and the
commission may consider an online sports wagering operator
permitholder fully qualified to hold an interactive gaming
operator permit under this section without additional
investigation. The fee for both an initial application and
renewal application shall be two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500.00). The application shall require an
applicant, at a minimum, to provide all information
required by W.S. 9-24-103(b) and any additional information
required by commission rules.

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(c) The commission shall charge a permit fee of one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) for an initial
interactive gaming operator permit. An initial permit and
any renewal permit shall each be valid for five (5) years.
The commission shall charge a fee of fifty thousand dollars
($50,000.00) for renewal of an interactive gaming operator
permit.

(d) An interactive gaming vendor shall possess a
permit issued by the commission to conduct business in the
state. No person shall provide vendor services to an
interactive gaming operator without holding a valid permit
issued by the commission.

(e) The commission shall charge a fee of ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00) for an initial interactive gaming
vendor permit. An initial permit and any renewal permit
shall each be valid for five (5) years. The commission
shall charge a fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for
renewal of an interactive gaming vendor permit.

(f) Interactive gaming operator and interactive
gaming vendor permit fees charged pursuant to subsections
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(c) and (e) of this section shall be deposited in the
commission gaming account. Subject to legislative
appropriation, amounts within the account may be used by
the commission for all expenses incurred in administering
this article. On a quarterly basis, the commission shall
transfer amounts within the account in excess of five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) to the state
treasurer for credit to the general fund.

(g) The following persons are considered to be
interactive gaming operator permit applicants or permit
holders:

(i) Each holding company, parent company or
subsidiary company of the applicant or permit holder;

(ii) Each person, except for a bank or other
licensed lending institution that holds a mortgage or other
lien acquired in the ordinary course of business, who owns
fifteen percent (15%) or more of an applicant or permit
holder and has the ability to:

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(A) Control the activities of the applicant
or permit holder; or

(B) Elect a majority of the board of the
applicant or permit holder.

(iii) Any person the commission otherwise
determines has the ability to control the noncorporate
applicant or permit holder;

(iv) Key personnel of an applicant or permit
holder, including any executive, employee or agent having
the power to exercise ultimate decision making authority
over the applicant's or permit holder's interactive gaming
operations in this state.

(h) The commission shall, not more than ninety (90)
days after the date of receipt of an application for a
permit or renewal of a permit, either:

(i) Issue the permit; or

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(ii) Deny the application based on the grounds
that the applicant failed to qualify as provided by
subsection (j) of this section.

(j) The commission shall deny an application under
this section to anyone, including persons listed under
subsection (g) of this section, upon finding any of the
following:

(i) The applicant or permit holder has been
convicted of, forfeited bail on or pleaded guilty or nolo
contendere to:

(A) A crime involving theft, dishonesty or
fraud;

(B) The crime of bribery or unlawfully
influencing a public official;

(C) A felony crime involving physical harm
to a person; or

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(D) Any other crime identified by rule of
the commission that negatively impacts the applicant's
credibility or the security, integrity or fairness of
interactive gaming.

(ii) The applicant intentionally tampered with
submitted documentation or concealed, failed to disclose or
otherwise attempted to mislead the commission with respect
to any material fact contained in the application or
contained in any other information required of or submitted
by an applicant to the commission;

(iii) The applicant or permit holder failed or
refused to cooperate in the investigation of a crime
related to gambling, corruption of a public official or any
organized criminal activity;

(iv) The applicant or permit holder
intentionally failed to disclose the existence or identity
of other persons who have control of the applicant or
permit holder as required by this section;

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(v) The applicant or permit holder does not
demonstrate financial responsibility sufficient to
adequately meet the requirements of this article, as
specified by rule of the commission; or

(vi) The applicant or permit holder has not met
the requirements of this section, any other provision of
this article or commission rules.

(k) Given a sufficient number of qualified
applicants, at any one (1) time the commission shall issue
not less than five (5) interactive gaming operator permits
to applicants that satisfy the requirements of this
article. If an insufficient number of applicants apply for
an interactive gaming operator permit, this provision shall
not be interpreted to direct the commission to issue a
permit to an unqualified applicant.

(m) Subject to subsection (k) of this section and the
requirements of this article, the commission may give
preference to an interactive gaming vendor that is
currently operating in good standing in a similar role in
at least three (3) states in the United States under a
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
state regulatory structure and that has paid all required
fees under subsection (e) of this section when making
interactive gaming operator permit application
determinations.

(n) Permit holders under this article shall have an
ongoing obligation to disclose in writing any material
change in the information provided in the application to
the commission, including:

(i) Changes to names and contact information;

(ii) Arrests, convictions, guilty or nolo
contendere pleas, disciplinary actions or permit denials in
Wyoming or any other jurisdiction;

(iii) Any civil action brought against the
permit holder related to gaming; and

(iv) Any other information specified by rule of
the commission.

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(o) If the commission denies an application or
intends to revoke or suspend a permit issued under this
article, it shall notify the applicant or permittee in
writing, stating the grounds for denial, revocation or
suspension and inform the person of a right to submit,
within thirty (30) days, any additional documentation
relating to the grounds for denial, revocation or
suspension. Upon receiving any additional documentation,
the commission shall reconsider its decision and inform the
applicant of its decision within not more than twenty (20)
days of the submission of information for reconsideration.
If the commission finds that public safety or welfare
requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to
that effect in its order, summary suspension of a permit
may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other
action. A denial of an application or a revocation or
suspension of a permit under this article shall be subject
to the contested case procedures of the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act.

9-24-204. Distribution of revenue.

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(a) Not later than the fifteenth day of each month,
in accordance with commission rules, an interactive gaming
operator shall remit sixteen percent (16%) of its
interactive gaming revenue from the prior month to the
commission. The first three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000.00) of interactive gaming revenue collected under
this section shall be continuously appropriated to the
department of health to be distributed to the counties for
the purpose of funding county health programs to prevent
and treat problematic gaming behavior. Of the remaining
revenue, the commission shall remit these monies to the
state treasurer for distribution as follows:

(i) Forty percent (40%) to the counties whose
shares shall be based upon population;

(ii) Fifty percent (50%) to the school
foundation program account;

(iii) Ten percent (10%) to the commission gaming
account, a portion of which shall cover administrative
costs and expenses.

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
9-24-205. Age to engage in interactive gaming.

No person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall
engage in interactive gaming.

9-24-206. Reciprocal agreements.

(a) The state may enter into reciprocal agreements
with permissible jurisdictions for the conduct of
interactive gaming, provided the agreements are not
inconsistent with federal law and the law of the
jurisdiction in which the person placing a wager is
located.

(b) An interactive gaming operator in this state may
accept interactive gaming wagers from persons physically
located in a permissible jurisdiction pursuant to a
reciprocal agreement.

(c) A reciprocal agreement with a permissible
jurisdiction may allow a person physically located in this
state to place a wager on an interactive game offered
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
pursuant to a regulatory structure in the permissible
jurisdiction.

9-24-207. Penalties; compliance.

(a) Any person who knowingly accepts an interactive
gaming wager or otherwise operates a business of
interactive gaming and does not possess a valid permit
issued by the commission under this article shall be
subject to the following, in addition to any penalty
imposed under W.S. 6-7-102:

(i) For a first offense, a civil penalty of
fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00);

(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, a civil
penalty of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00).

(b) Any person that allows a person under the age of
twenty‑one (21) years to engage in interactive gaming or who
does not possess a valid permit issued by the commission
under this article and that provides or makes available
computers or devices to enable members of the public to
HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
participate in interactive gaming in a specific place, or
that establishes or maintains a facility for the conduct of
interactive gaming by members of the public, shall be
subject to the following, in addition to any penalty
imposed under W.S. 6-7-102:

(i) For a first offense, a civil penalty of
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00);

(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, a civil
penalty of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00).

(c) If a series of similar events result in a
violation under this article, those events that occur
within the same month shall be treated as one (1) offense
and not separate and distinct offenses.

Section 2. W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iii) by creating a new
subparagraph (P) and 11-25-104(o) by creating a new
paragraph (iii) are amended to read:

6-7-101. Definitions.

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
(a) As used in this article:

(iii) "Gambling" means risking any property for
gain contingent in whole or in part upon lot, chance, the
operation of a gambling device or the happening or outcome
of an event, including a sporting event, over which the
person taking a risk has no control, but does not include
any of the following:

(P) Interactive gaming regulated under W.S.
9-24-201 through 9-24-207.

11-25-104. Gaming commission; officers; director;
meetings; quorum; records; licenses generally; effect of
financial interest in events.

(o) In addition to all other duties, the commission,
in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall:

(iii) Regulate online interactive gaming and
interactive gaming operators and vendors under W.S.
9-24-201 through 9-24-207.

HB0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0292
Section 3. Not later than December 31, 2025 the
gaming commission shall promulgate rules required by this
act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
January 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0162